Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-481
Certain wild
animals; keeping in captivity; permit not required; when.

Sections 37-477 to 37-480 shall not be construed to require the
obtaining of a permit for the purpose of keeping in captivity wild birds,
wild mammals, or wildlife as specified in subsection (1) of section 37-477
or for the purpose of purchasing, possessing, propagating, selling, bartering,
or otherwise disposing of any wild birds, wild mammals, or wildlife as specified
in subsection (1) of section 37-477 by (1) any zoo, park, refuge, wildlife
area, or nature center owned or operated by a city, village, state, or federal
agency or any zoo accredited
by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums or the Zoological Association of
America or (2) any circus licensed by the United States Department
of Agriculture.

Laws 1957, c. 151, § 5, p. 491;

Laws 1969, c. 296, § 1, p. 1069;

Laws 1986, LB 558, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-717;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 191;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 60;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 25.